Tennessee, session 114, SB2389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 24, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "government-issued identification card" means a
valid, government-issued identification card that bears the cardholder's name, address,
and photograph, and that contains a unique identifying series of numbers or letters, or
both, as applicable to the type or category of government-issued identification card.
(b) A register of deeds shall require a person presenting a document to transfer
real property in person for filing in the real property records of the county to present a
government-issued identification card prior to recording the document.
(c) The register shall copy or record information from the presented government-
issued identification card.
(d) The register shall not charge a person a fee to copy or record the information
from the presented government-issued identification card.
(e) Information copied or recorded from the presented government-issued
identification card is confidential.
(f) A document filed with a county clerk is not invalid solely because the county
clerk did not copy or record the information from the presented government-issued
identification card.
(h) This section is repealed two (2) years from the effective date of this act.
SB2389
012644
- 1 -

(i) This section applies to a county having a population of no less than nine
hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent
federal census.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012644